Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-9204
Health Care Data Base Advisory Committee;
duties; Director of Insurance; report.

(1) The Health Care Data Base Advisory Committee shall make
recommendations to the Director of Insurance regarding the Nebraska Health
Care Data Base that:

(a) Include specific
strategies to measure and collect data related to health care safety and quality,
utilization, health outcomes, and cost;

(b) Focus on data elements that foster quality improvement
and peer group comparisons;

(c) Facilitate value-based, cost-effective purchasing
of health care services by public and private purchasers and consumers;

(d) Result in
usable and comparable information that allows public and private health care
purchasers, consumers, and data analysts to identify and compare health plans,
health insurers, health care facilities, and health care providers regarding
the provision of safe, cost-effective, high-quality health care services;

(e) Use and build
upon existing data collection standards, reporting requirements, and methods
to establish and maintain the data base in a cost-effective and efficient
manner;

(f)
Incorporate and utilize claims, eligibility, and other publicly available
data to the extent it is the most cost-effective method of collecting data
to minimize the cost and administrative burden on data sources;

(g) Include discussions
regarding the standardization of the Nebraska Health Care Data Base with other
states and regions and federal efforts concerning all-payer claims data bases;

(h) Include discussions
regarding the integration of data collection requirements of the health insurance
exchange as required by the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care
Act, Public Law 111-148, as amended by the federal Health Care and Education
Reconciliation Act of 2010, Public Law 111-152, and any amendments thereto
or regulations or guidance issued under those acts;

(i) Include discussions regarding
a limit on the number of times the Nebraska Health Care Data Base may require
submission of the required data elements;

(j) Include discussions regarding a limit on the number
of times the data base may change the required data elements for submission
in a calendar year considering administrative costs, resources, and time required
to fulfill the requests;

(k) Include discussions regarding compliance with
the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Public
Law 104-191, as amended, and other proprietary information related to collection
and release of data;

(l) Discuss issues surrounding the availability of
the data for research and other purposes; and

(m) Include whether the advisory
committee should continue to exist and provide recommendations to the Department
of Insurance regarding the Nebraska Health Care Data Base after the report
required in subsection (2) of this section is completed.

(2) On or before
December 15, 2014, the Director of Insurance shall report to the Governor
and the Legislature the recommendations of the advisory committee.

Laws 2014, LB76, § 4.
February 14, 2014